Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIX Provisional Remedies, Enforcement of Judgments, and Exemptions
Attachment

425.301.
Grounds for attachment in action for recovery of money.

The plaintiff may, at or after the commencement of an action, have an attachment against the property of the defendant, including garnishees, as a security for the satisfaction of such judgment as may be recovered:

In an action for the recovery of money against:

A defendant who is a foreign corporation or nonresident of the state; or

Who has been absent herefrom for four (4) months; or

Has departed herefrom with intent to defraud his creditors; or

Has left the county of his residence to avoid the service of a summons; or

So conceals himself that a summons cannot be served upon him; or

Is about to remove, or has removed, his property, or a material part thereof, out of this state, not leaving enough therein to satisfy the plaintiff’s claim, or the claims of said defendant’s creditors; or

Has sold, conveyed, or otherwise disposed of, his property, or suffered or permitted it to be sold, with the fraudulent intent to cheat, hinder or delay his creditors; or

Is about to sell, convey, or otherwise dispose of his property, with such intent. But an attachment shall not be granted on the ground that the defendant is a foreign corporation, or a nonresident of this state, for any claim other than a debt or demand arising upon a contract, express or implied, or a judgment or award.

In an action for the recovery of money due upon a contract, judgment or award, if the defendant have no property in this state subject to execution, or not enough thereof to satisfy the plaintiff’s demand, and the collection of the demand will be endangered by delay in obtaining judgment or a return of no property found;

Before an order of attachment shall issue prior to judgment, the person seeking the order must first make a demand in writing at or after the time the suit is filed, by delivering such demand and a copy of the complaint, motion and summons to the debtor or by sending them to him by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to his last known place of residence, at least seven (7) and not more than sixty (60) days before such order is sought. The demand shall contain a statement in substance that the debtor has seven (7) days in which to petition the court for a hearing or in which to pay the claim in full, and that unless a hearing is set or the claim paid, an order will be sought to subject his property to payment of the claim. The statement shall identify the court in which the suit has been filed, the grounds therefor, the date of the demand, the amount of the claim, and the name and address of the plaintiff and his attorney. An affidavit of the plaintiff or his attorney evidencing compliance with this section shall be filed before an order shall be issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 26; 1978, ch. 399, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

425.302.
Application for release of attachment.

Any defendant whose property is attached pursuant to an attachment issued under KRS

425.301

,

425.306

, or

425.308

, may apply for an order that the attachment be quashed and any property taken, or attached, be released from the attachment. Such application shall be made by noticed motion. A defendant making a motion to quash pursuant to this section shall be entitled to an immediate hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 158, § 7, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Application for Release of Money Held In Attachment Or Garnishment, Form 150.14.

425.305.
Discharge of attachment upon giving of bond — Sheriff or clerk may take bond. [Repealed.]

425.306.
Grounds of attachment for debt or liability upon a contract.

Before a debt or liability upon a contract becomes due or matures, an equitable action for indemnity may be brought by a creditor against his debtor; by a surety against his principal; or by one who is jointly liable with another for such debt or liability, against the latter:

If the defendant be about to depart from this state, and, with intent to defraud his creditors, have concealed or removed from this state his property, or so much thereof that the process of court, after judgment, cannot be executed.

If there exist against the defendant any of the grounds for an attachment which are mentioned in paragraphs (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (h) of subsection (1) of KRS

425.301

.

Upon an action being filed, if the petition shows the existence of any of the grounds specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section the court may order an attachment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 27; 1980, ch. 188, § 295, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Notice and Demand Letter, Form 150.03.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Verified Motion for Attachment, Form 150.05.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Verified Motion for Order of Attachment Against Non-Resident, Form 150.06.

425.307.
Motion for order of attachment.

Upon filing of the complaint or at any time prior to judgment, the plaintiff may apply pursuant to this chapter for an order of attachment by filing a written motion for the order with the court in which the action is brought.

The motion shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

The nature of the plaintiff’s claim;

That it is just;

The sum which the plaintiff believes he ought to recover; and

The existence of any of the grounds for an attachment set forth in KRS

425.301

or

425.306

.

The order of attachment shall be issued by the clerk upon compliance with KRS

425.301

(3) unless the defendant has requested a hearing, in which case a hearing shall be conducted pursuant to KRS

425.031

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 399, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

425.308.
Ex parte order of attachment, issuance.

A judicial officer, except as otherwise provided by statute, may issue an ex parte order of attachment if it appears from facts shown by affidavit that great or irreparable injury would result to the plaintiff if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

The plaintiff’s motion shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

425.307

and in addition shall include a showing that great or irreparable injury would result to the plaintiff if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 399, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mapother, Prejudgment Seizure — Practice and Procedure in Kentucky, Vol. 42, No. 3, October 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Mapother, Prejudgment Seizure — Part II, Vol. 43, No. 2, April 1979, Ky. Bench & Bar 23.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Attachment and Garnishment, § 150.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Attachment — Personal Property, Form 150.09.

425.309.
Posting of bond by plaintiff — Posting of bond by defendant — Exceptions to sureties.

An order of attachment shall not be issued until a bond has been executed by one (1) or more sufficient sureties of the plaintiff in an amount not less than double the amount of the plaintiff’s claim.

Should the defendant post a bond, with sufficient sureties, insuring compliance with a final judgment, in an amount equal to the plaintiff’s claim, including court costs and attorney’s fees as stated in plaintiff’s complaint, the attachment shall be dissolved and any proceeds of the attachment received by the plaintiff shall be returned to the defendant.

Exceptions to sureties shall be made in accordance with KRS

425.121

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 399, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 158, § 6, effective July 13, 1984.

425.310.
Payment of money by garnishee — Costs. [Repealed.]

425.311.
Execution of attachment under KRS 425.301 or 425.306. [Repealed.]

425.312.
Writ of possession. [Repealed and reenacted.]

425.315.
Appearance and answer by garnishee — Procedure if garnishee fail to appear. [Repealed.]

425.316.
Examination.

Any person owing debts to the defendant, or having in his possession or under his control any personal property belonging to the defendant, may be required to appear before the court and be examined on oath regarding such property.

If the person ordered to appear pursuant to this section fails to appear, the court may as in cases of contempt punish a disobedience.

After such examination, if the person admits that he is indebted to the defendant, or that he holds property belonging to the defendant, the court may order that such debt or property belonging to the defendant be attached in the manner and under the conditions provided by this chapter and that any amount owing be paid to the levying officer. If the person admits that he holds property which belongs to the defendant and in which he claims no interest the court may order that such property be delivered to the levying officer on such terms as may be just.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 29.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion and Order Requiring Person Owing Debts to Defendant to be Examined, Form 154.02.

425.320.
Procedure if garnishee indebted to defendant. [Repealed.]

425.325.
Action by plaintiff against garnishee — Attachment. [Repealed.]

425.330.
Proceedings upon judgment for defendant. [Repealed.]

425.335.
Proceedings upon judgment for plaintiff. [Repealed.]

425.340.
Affidavit required before sale of realty seized under attachment. [Repealed.]

425.345.
Return of surplus to defendant. [Repealed.]

425.346.
Entry of appearance by executing bond to discharge attachment. [Repealed.]

425.350.
Proceedings to compel delivery of property and payment of proceeds. [Repealed.]

425.355.
Court may control property and proceeds. [Repealed.]

425.360.
Court may order sheriff to retake property. [Repealed.]

425.365.
Commissioner may ascertain and report amounts and priorities of several attachments. [Repealed.]

425.370.
Additional surety on plaintiff’s bond may be required. [Repealed.]

425.375.
Grounds of action for indemnity — Order of arrest or attachment may be obtained. [Repealed.]

425.380.
Order to specify sum for which allowed. [Repealed.]

425.385.
Bond required before issual of order. [Repealed.]

425.390.
Procedures governing arrests and attachments in actions for indemnity. [Repealed.]

425.395.
Judgment before maturity of debt — Creditor to be party — Costs. [Repealed.]

425.400.
Judgment in action by creditor — Application of money under control of court. [Repealed.]

425.405.
Judgment in action by surety against principal. [Repealed.]

425.410.
Judgment in action between persons jointly liable. [Repealed.]

425.415.
Defendant’s money under court’s control to be applied in satisfaction of judgment. [Repealed.]

425.420.
Judgment against defendant to include costs — Enforcement — Judgment before maturity of debt. [Repealed.]

425.425.
Joint debtor to pay residue of creditor’s demand before judgment. [Repealed.]

425.430.
When specific attachments allowed — Grounds — Vendor’s action to cancel fraudulent purchase. [Repealed.]

425.435.
Who may grant specific attachment. [Repealed.]

425.440.
Plaintiff’s bond — Defendant may retain property upon giving bond — Order not to issue until bond executed. [Repealed.]

425.445.
Requisites of order — Execution and return. [Repealed.]

425.450.
Disposition of attached property. [Repealed.]

425.455.
Sheriff may pursue and retake removed property. [Repealed.]

425.460.
Defendant must give information concerning concealed or removed property. [Repealed.]

425.465.
Procedures applicable to specific attachments. [Repealed.]

425.470.
Time for sustaining or discharging attachments. [Repealed.]

425.475.
Attachment discharged upon judgment for defendant. [Repealed.]

425.480.
When judgment for plaintiff sustains attachment. [Repealed.]

425.485.
Use of property, proceeds or securities to satisfy judgment. [Repealed.]

425.490.
Procedure for controverting statements of affidavit upon which attachment issued — Time for filing. [Repealed.]

425.495.
Trial of attachment — Evidence. [Repealed.]

425.500.
When defendant may move for discharge of attachment — Notice. [Repealed.]